Utah statutes.
59-2-1305.   Entries of payments made -- Payments to county treasurer.

(1)  The assessor or, if this duty has been reassigned in an ordinance under Section 17-16-5.5, the treasurer shall note on the assessment roll, opposite the names of each person against whom taxes have been assessed, the amount of the taxes paid.

(2) (a)  The assessor or treasurer, as the case may be, shall require all checks to be made payable to the office of the county assessor or treasurer, respectively.

(b)  If the assessor or treasurer receives checks made payable to a payee other than the office of the county assessor or treasurer, respectively, the assessor or treasurer, as the case may be, shall immediately endorse the check with a restrictive endorsement that makes the check payable to the office of the county treasurer.

(3)  The assessor shall deposit all money the assessor collects into an account controlled by the county treasurer.



Amended by Chapter 207, 1999 General Session

